District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.39

Voting of shares — Notice of meetings; waiver of notice.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 194, ch. 269, § 39
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 7
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.39.
1981 Ed., § 29-339.
1973 Ed., § 29-916g.